Washington statutes.
RCW 8.25.210

Special benefits to remaining property—Purpose.

It is the purpose of *this 1974 act to provide procedures whereby more just and equitable results are accomplished when real property has been condemned for a highway, road, or street and an award made which is subject to a setoff for benefits inuring to the condemnee's remaining land.

[ 1974 ex.s. c 79 s 1.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: For codification of "this 1974 act" [1974 ex.s. c 79], see Codification Tables.